Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska26-101
Act, how cited.

Sections 26-101 to 26-125 shall be known and may be cited as the Protection Orders Act.

Laws 2025, LB80, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB753, § 1.
July 18, 2026